Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0034.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 201. As used in this article: (a) "Employer" means a person that has 1 or more employees, and includes an agent of that person. (b) "Employment agency" means a person regularly undertaking with or without compensation to procure, refer, recruit, or place an employee for an employer or to procure, refer, recruit, or place for an employer or person the opportunity to work for an employer and includes an agent of that person. (c) "Labor organization" includes: (i) An organization of any kind, or an agency or employee representation committee, group, association, or plan, in which employees participate and that exists for the purpose, in whole or in part, of dealing with employers concerning grievances, labor disputes, wages, rates of pay, hours, or other terms or conditions of employment. (ii) A conference, general committee, joint or system board, or joint council that is subordinate to a national or international labor organization. (iii) An agent of a labor organization. (d) "Sex" includes, but is not limited to, pregnancy or lactating status, childbirth, the termination of a pregnancy, or a related medical condition. Sec. 301. As used in this article: (a) "Place of public accommodation" means a business, or an educational, refreshment, entertainment, recreation, health, or transportation facility, or institution of any kind, whether licensed or not, whose goods, services, facilities, privileges, advantages, or accommodations are extended, offered, sold, or otherwise made available to the public. Place of public accommodation also includes the facilities of the following private clubs: (i) A country club or golf club. (ii) A boating or yachting club. (iii) A sports or athletic club. (iv) A dining club, except a dining club that in good faith limits its membership to the members of a particular religion for the purpose of furthering the teachings or principles of that religion and not for the purpose of excluding individuals of a particular sex, race, or color. (b) "Public service" means a public facility, department, agency, board, or commission, owned, operated, or managed by or on behalf of this state, a political subdivision, or an agency of this state or of a political subdivision or a tax exempt private agency established to provide service to the public, except that public service does not include a state or county correctional facility with respect to actions and decisions regarding an individual serving a sentence of imprisonment. (c) "Sex" includes, but is not limited to, pregnancy or lactating status.